Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 11 IDAHO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE
It is an affirmative defense in a trial by court-martial that, at the time of the commission of the acts constituting the offense, the accused, as a result of a severe mental disease or defect, was unable to appreciate the nature and quality or the wrongfulness of the acts. Mental disease or defect does not otherwise constitute a defense.

The accused has the burden of proving the defense of lack of mental responsibility by clear and convincing evidence.

Whenever lack of mental responsibility of the accused with respect to an offense is properly at issue, the military judge shall instruct the members of the court as to the defense of lack of mental responsibility under this article and charge them to find the accused:

Guilty;

Not guilty; or

Not guilty only by reason of lack of mental responsibility.

Subsection (c) of this article does not apply to a court-martial composed of a military judge only. In the case of a court-martial composed of a military judge only or a summary court-martial officer, whenever lack of mental responsibility of the accused with respect to an offense is properly at issue, the military judge or summary court-martial officer shall find the accused:

Guilty;

Not guilty; or

Not guilty only by reason of lack of mental responsibility.

Notwithstanding the provisions of article 52 of this code, the accused shall be found not guilty only by reason of lack of mental responsibility if:

A majority of the members of the court-martial present at the time the vote is taken determines that the defense of lack of mental responsibility has been established; or

In the case of a court-martial composed of a military judge only or a summary court-martial officer, the military judge or summary court-martial officer determines that the defense of lack of mental responsibility has been established.

ARTICLE 51. VOTING AND RULINGS

Voting by members of a general or special court-martial on the findings and on the sentence shall be by secret written ballot. The junior member of the court shall count the votes. The count shall be checked by the president, who shall forthwith announce the result of the ballot to the members of the court.

The military judge shall rule upon all questions of law and all interlocutory questions arising during the proceedings. Any such ruling made by the military judge upon any question of law or any interlocutory question other than the factual issue of mental responsibility of the accused is final and constitutes the ruling of the court. However, the military judge may change the ruling at any time during the trial. Unless the ruling is final, if any member objects thereto, the court shall be cleared and closed and the question decided by a voice vote as provided in article 52 of this code, beginning with the junior in rank.

Before a vote is taken on the findings, the military judge shall, in the presence of the accused and counsel, instruct the members of the court as to the elements of the offense and charge them:

That the accused must be presumed to be innocent until his guilt is established by legal and competent evidence beyond reasonable doubt;

That in the case being considered, if there is a reasonable doubt as to the guilt of the accused, the doubt must be resolved in favor of the accused and the accused must be acquitted;

That, if there is a reasonable doubt as to the degree of guilt, the finding must be in a lower degree as to which there is no reasonable doubt; and

That the burden of proof to establish the guilt of the accused beyond reasonable doubt is upon the state.

Subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this article do not apply to a court-martial composed of a military judge only. The military judge of such a court-martial shall determine all questions of law and fact arising during the proceedings and, if the accused is convicted, adjudge an appropriate sentence. The military judge of such a court-martial shall make a general finding and shall in addition, on request, find the facts specially. If an opinion or memorandum of decision is filed, it will be sufficient if the findings of fact appear therein.

ARTICLE 52. VOTES REQUIRED FOR CONVICTION, SENTENCING, AND OTHER MATTERS

In general. No person may be convicted of an offense in a general or special court-martial, other than:

After a plea of guilty under article 45(b);

By a military judge in a court-martial with a military judge alone, under article 16; or

In a court-martial with members under article 16, by the concurrence of at least three-fourths (¾) of the members present when the vote is taken.

Level of concurrence required.

In general. Except as provided in subsection (a) of this article and in paragraph (2) of this subsection, all matters to be decided by members of a general or special court-martial shall be determined by a majority vote, but a reconsideration of a finding of guilty or reconsideration of a sentence, with a view toward decreasing the sentence, may be made by any lesser vote which indicates that the reconsideration is not opposed by the number of votes required for that finding or sentence.

Sentencing. All sentences imposed by members shall be determined by the concurrence of at least three-fourths (¾) of the members present when the vote is taken.

ARTICLE 53. FINDINGS AND SENTENCING

Announcement. A court-martial shall announce its findings and sentence to the parties as soon as determined.

Sentencing generally.

General and special courts-martial.

Sentencing by military judge. Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, and in this code for capital offenses, if the accused is convicted of an offense in a trial by general or special court-martial, the military judge shall sentence the accused.

Sentencing by members. If the accused is convicted of an offense by general or special court-martial consisting of a military judge and members, and the accused elects sentencing by members under article 25, the members shall sentence the accused.

Sentence of the accused. The sentence determined pursuant to this paragraph constitutes the sentence of the accused.

Summary courts-martial. If the accused is convicted of an offense in a trial by summary court-martial, the court-martial shall sentence the accused.

In general.

At any time before the announcement of findings under article 53, the convening authority and the accused may enter into a plea agreement with respect to such matters as the manner in which the convening authority will dispose of one (1) or more charges and specifications and limitations on the sentence that may be adjudged for one (1) or more charges and specifications.

The military judge of a general or special court-martial may not participate in discussions between the parties concerning prospective terms and conditions of a plea agreement.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this article, contains a provision for a sentence that is less than the mandatory minimum sentence applicable to an offense;

Is prohibited by law; or

Is contrary to, or is inconsistent with, a regulation prescribed by the governor or his designated representative with respect to terms, conditions, or other aspects of plea agreements.

Binding effect of plea agreement. Upon acceptance by the military judge of a general or special court-martial, a plea agreement shall bind the parties and the court-martial.

ARTICLE 53a. PLEA AGREEMENTS

(b) Limitation on acceptance of plea agreements. The military judge of a general or special court-martial shall reject a plea agreement that:

(1) Contains a provision that has not been accepted by both parties;

(2) Contains a provision that is not understood by the accused;

(c) Limited conditions for acceptance of plea agreement for sentence below mandatory minimum for certain offenses. With respect to an offense:

(1) The military judge may accept a plea agreement that provides for a sentence of bad-conduct discharge; and

(2) Upon recommendation of the trial counsel, in exchange for substantial assistance by the accused in the investigation or prosecution of another person who has committed an offense, the military judge may accept a plea agreement that provides for a sentence that is less than the mandatory minimum sentence for the offense charged.

ARTICLE 54. RECORD OF TRIAL

General and special courts-martial. Each general or special court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case brought before it. The record shall be certified by a court reporter, except that in the case of death, disability, or absence of a court reporter, the record shall be certified by an official selected as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe by regulation.

A complete verbatim record of the proceedings and testimony shall be prepared in each general and special court-martial case resulting in a conviction; and
(b)(1) A complete verbatim record of the proceedings and testimony shall be prepared in each general and special court-martial case resulting in a conviction; and

In all other court-martial cases, the record shall contain such matters as may be prescribed by regulations.

Summary courts-martial. Each summary court-martial shall keep a separate record of the proceedings in each case, and the record shall be certified in the manner as may be prescribed by regulations.

Copy to accused. A copy of the record of the proceedings of each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as it is certified.

Contents of record.

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the record shall contain such matters as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe by regulation.

In accordance with regulations prescribed by the governor or his designated representative, a complete record of proceedings and testimony shall be prepared in any case of a sentence of death, dismissal, discharge, confinement for more than six (6) months, or forfeiture of pay for more than six (6) months.

A copy of the record of the proceedings of each general and special court-martial shall be given to the accused as soon as it is certified.

In the case of a general or special court-martial, upon request, a copy of all prepared records of the proceedings of the court-martial shall be given to the victim of the offense if the victim testified during the proceedings. The records of the proceedings shall be provided without charge and as soon as the records are certified. The victim shall be notified of the opportunity to receive the records of the proceedings.

PART VIII. SENTENCES

ARTICLE 55. CRUEL AND UNUSUAL PUNISHMENTS PROHIBITED

Punishment by flogging, or by branding, marking, or tattooing on the body, or any other cruel or unusual punishment may not be adjudged by a court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this code. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

ARTICLE 56. SENTENCING

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense may not exceed such limits as prescribed by this code, but in no instance may a sentence exceed more than ten (10) years for a military offense, nor shall a sentence of death be adjudged. A conviction by general court-martial of any military offense for which an accused may receive a sentence of confinement for more than one (1) year is a felony offense. Except for convictions by a summary court-martial, all other military offenses are misdemeanors. Any conviction by a summary court-martial is not a criminal conviction.

The limits of punishment for violations of the punitive articles prescribed herein shall be the lesser of the sentences prescribed by the manual for courts-martial of the United States currently in effect, and the state manual for courts-martial, but in no instance shall any punishment exceed that authorized by this code.

Imposition of sentence.

In general. In sentencing an accused, a court-martial shall impose punishment that is sufficient, but not greater than necessary, to promote justice and to maintain good order and discipline in the state military forces, taking into consideration:

The nature and circumstances of the offense and the history and characteristics of the accused;

The impact of the offense on:

The financial, social, psychological, or medical well-being of any victim of the offense; and

The mission, discipline, or efficiency of the command of the accused and any victim of the offense;

To reflect the seriousness of the offense;

To promote respect for the law;

To provide just punishment for the offense;

To promote adequate deterrence of misconduct;

To protect others from further crimes by the accused;

To rehabilitate the accused; and

To provide, in appropriate cases, the opportunity for retraining and return to duty to meet the needs of the service; and

Sentencing by military judge. In announcing the sentence in a general or special court-martial in which the accused is sentenced by a military judge alone under article 53, the military judge shall, with respect to each offense of which the accused is found guilty, specify the term of confinement, if any, and the amount of the fine, if any. If the accused is sentenced to confinement for more than one (1) offense, the military judge shall specify whether the terms of confinement are to run consecutively or concurrently.

Sentencing by members. In a general or special court-martial in which the accused has elected sentencing by members, the court-martial shall announce a single sentence for all of the offenses of which the accused was found guilty.

Appeal of sentence to the district court of the county where the court-martial is held.

With the approval of the senior force judge advocate concerned, the government may appeal a sentence, on the grounds that the sentence violates the law or the sentence is unreasonable.

An appeal under this subsection must be filed within forty-two (42) days after the date of entry of judgment.

(C) The need for the sentence:

(D) The sentences available under this chapter.

ARTICLE 56A. RESERVED

ARTICLE 57. EFFECTIVE DATE OF SENTENCES

Execution of sentences. A court-martial sentence shall be executed and take effect as follows:

Forfeiture and reduction. A forfeiture of pay or allowances shall be applicable to pay and allowances accruing on and after the date on which the sentence takes effect. Any forfeiture of pay or allowances or reduction in grade that is included in a sentence of a court-martial takes effect on the earlier of:

The date that is fourteen (14) days after the date on which the sentence is adjudged; or

In the case of a summary court-martial, the date on which the sentence is approved by the convening authority.

Confinement. Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is adjudged by the court-martial, but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended or deferred shall be excluded in computing the service of the term of confinement.

Approval of dismissal. If, in the case of a commissioned officer, cadet, or midshipman, the sentence of a court-martial extends to dismissal, that part of the sentence providing for dismissal may not be executed until approved by the secretary concerned or such undersecretary or assistant secretary as may be designated by the secretary concerned. In such a case, the secretary, undersecretary, or assistant secretary, as the case may be, may commute, remit, or suspend the sentence, or any part of the sentence, as the secretary sees fit. In time of war or national emergency, he may commute a sentence of dismissal to reduction to any enlisted grade. A person so reduced may be required to serve for the duration of the war or emergency and six (6) months thereafter.

Completion of appellate review. If a sentence extends to dismissal, or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal, or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge, may be executed in accordance with service regulations after completion of appellate review and, with respect to dismissal, approval under paragraph (3) or (4) of this subsection, as appropriate.

Other sentences. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a general or special court-martial sentence is effective upon entry of judgment and a summary court-martial sentence is effective when the convening authority acts on the sentence.

Deferral of sentences.

In general. On application by an accused, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under his jurisdiction, the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned may, in his sole discretion, defer the effective date of a sentence of confinement, reduction, or forfeiture. The deferment shall terminate upon entry of judgment or, in the case of a summary court-martial, when the convening authority acts on the sentence. The deferment may be rescinded at any time by the officer who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under his jurisdiction, by the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned.

Deferral of certain persons sentenced to confinement. In any case in which a court-martial sentences a person referred to in paragraph (3) of this subsection to confinement, the convening authority may defer the service of the sentence to confinement, without the consent of that person, until after the person has been permanently released to the state military forces by a state or foreign country referred to in that paragraph.

Covered persons. Paragraph (2) of this subsection applies to a person subject to this chapter who, while in the custody of a state or foreign country, is temporarily returned by that state or foreign country to the state military forces for trial by court-martial and, after the court-martial, is returned to that state or foreign country under the authority of a mutual agreement or treaty, as the case may be.

State defined. In this subsection, the term “state” includes the District of Columbia and any commonwealth, territory, or possession of the United States.

Deferral while review pending. In any case in which a court-martial sentences a person to confinement, but in which review of the case is pending, the secretary concerned may defer further service of the sentence to confinement while that review is pending.

Appellate review.

Completion of appellate review. Appellate review is complete under this article when a review under this code is completed or a review is completed by the Idaho state courts in accordance with the applicable rules of procedure of the Idaho state courts.

Completion as final judgment of legality of proceedings. The completion of appellate review shall constitute a final judgment as to the legality of the proceedings.

ARTICLE 58. EXECUTION OF CONFINEMENT

A sentence of confinement adjudged by a court-martial, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in any place authorized by this code. Persons so confined are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons regularly confined or committed to that place of confinement.

The omission of “hard labor” as a sentence authorized under this code does not deprive the state confinement facility from employing it, if it otherwise is within the authority of that facility to do so.

No place of confinement may require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving or confining a person except as otherwise provided by law.

ARTICLE 58A. SENTENCES — REDUCTION IN ENLISTED GRADE

A court-martial sentence of an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-1, as set forth in the judgment of the court-martial entered into the record, includes:

A dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge;

Confinement; or

Reduction of that member to pay grade E-1, if such a reduction is authorized by regulation prescribed by the governor or his designated representative. The reduction in pay grade shall take effect on the date on which the judgment is so entered.

If the sentence of a member who is reduced in pay grade under subsection (a) of this article is set aside or reduced, or, as finally affirmed, does not include any punishment named in subsection (a)(1) or (2) of this article, the rights and privileges of which the person was deprived because of that reduction shall be restored, including pay and allowances.

ARTICLE 58B. SENTENCES — FORFEITURE OF PAY AND ALLOWANCES DURING CONFINEMENT

Generally.

A court-martial sentence described in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall result in the forfeiture of pay, or of pay and allowances, due that member during any period of confinement or parole. The forfeiture pursuant to this article shall take effect on the date determined under this code and may be deferred as provided by this code. The pay and allowances forfeited, in the case of a general court-martial, shall be all pay and allowances due that member during such period and, in the case of a special court-martial, shall be two-thirds (2/3) of all pay due that member during such period.

A sentence covered by this article is any sentence that includes:

Confinement for more than six (6) months; or

Confinement for six (6) months or less and a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge or dismissal.

In a case involving an accused who has dependents, the convening authority or other person acting under article 60 of this code may waive any or all of the forfeitures of pay and allowances required by subsection (a) of this article for a period not to exceed six (6) months. Any amount of pay or allowances that, except for a waiver under this subsection, would be forfeited shall be paid, as the convening authority or other person taking action directs, to the dependents of the accused.
(c) If the sentence of a member who forfeits pay and allowances under subsection (a) of this article is set aside or disapproved or, as finally approved, does not provide for a punishment referred to in subsection (a)(2) of this article, the member shall be paid the pay and allowances which the member would have been paid, except for the forfeiture, for the period during which the forfeiture was in effect.

PART IX. POSTTRIAL PROCEDURE AND REVIEW OF COURTS-MARTIAL

ARTICLE 59. ERROR OF LAW — LESSER INCLUDED OFFENSE

A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

Any reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm, instead, so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

ARTICLE 60. POSTTRIAL PROCESSING IN GENERAL AND SPECIAL COURTS-MARTIAL

Statement of trial results.

The military judge of a general or special court-martial shall enter into the record of trial a document entitled “statement of trial results,” which shall set forth:

Each plea and finding;

The sentence, if any; and

Such other information as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe by regulation.

Copies of the statement of trial results shall be provided promptly to the convening authority, the accused, and any victim of the offense.

Posttrial motions. In accordance with regulations prescribed by the governor or his designated representative, the military judge in a general or special court-martial shall address all posttrial motions and other posttrial matters that:

May affect a plea, a finding, the sentence, the statement of trial results, the record of trial, or any posttrial action by the convening authority; and

Are subject to resolution by the military judge before entry of judgment.

ARTICLE 61. WAIVER OF RIGHT TO APPEAL — WITHDRAWAL OF APPEAL

Waiver of right to appeal. After entry of judgment in a general or special court-martial, under procedures prescribed by the secretary concerned, the accused may waive the right to appellate review in each case subject to such review under this code. Such a waiver shall be signed by the accused and by defense counsel and attached to the record of trial.

Withdrawal of appeal. In a general or special court-martial, the accused may withdraw an appeal at any time.

Waiver or withdrawal as bar. A waiver or withdrawal under this article bars review under this code.

ARTICLE 62. APPEAL BY THE STATE

Generally.

In a trial by court-martial in which a punitive discharge may be adjudged, the state may appeal the following, other than a finding of not guilty with respect to the charge or specification by the members of the court-martial, or by a judge in a bench trial so long as it is not made in reconsideration:

An order or ruling of the military judge which terminates the proceedings with respect to a charge or specification.

An order or ruling which excludes evidence that is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.

An order or ruling which directs the disclosure of classified information.

An order or ruling which imposes sanctions for nondisclosure of classified information.

A refusal of the military judge to issue a protective order sought by the state to prevent the disclosure of classified information.

A refusal by the military judge to enforce an order described in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph that has previously been issued by appropriate authority.

An order or ruling of the military judge entering a finding of not guilty with respect to a charge or specification following the return of a finding of guilty by the members.

An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken unless the trial counsel provides the military judge with written notice of appeal from the order or ruling within seventy-two (72) hours of the order or ruling. Such notice shall include a certification by the trial counsel that the appeal is not taken for the purpose of delay and, if the order or ruling appealed is one which excludes evidence, that the evidence excluded is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.
(2)(A) An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken unless the trial counsel provides the military judge with written notice of appeal from the order or ruling within seventy-two (72) hours of the order or ruling. Such notice shall include a certification by the trial counsel that the appeal is not taken for the purpose of delay and, if the order or ruling appealed is one which excludes evidence, that the evidence excluded is substantial proof of a fact material in the proceeding.

An appeal of an order or ruling may not be taken when prohibited by article 44.

An appeal under this article shall be diligently prosecuted as provided by law.

An appeal under this article shall be forwarded to the court prescribed in article 67a of this code. In ruling on an appeal under this article, that court may act only with respect to matters of law.

Any period of delay resulting from an appeal under this article shall be excluded in deciding any issue regarding denial of a speedy trial unless an appropriate authority determines that the appeal was filed solely for the purpose of delay with the knowledge that it was totally frivolous and without merit.

The United States may appeal a ruling or order of a military magistrate in the same manner as had the ruling or order been made by a military judge, except that the issue shall first be presented to the military judge who designated the military magistrate or to a military judge detailed to hear the issue.

The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

ARTICLE 63. REHEARINGS

Each rehearing under this code shall take place before a court-martial composed of members not members of the court-martial which first heard the case. Upon a rehearing, the accused may not be tried for any offense of which he was found not guilty by the first court-martial, and no sentence in excess of or more severe than the original sentence may be adjudged, unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense not considered upon the merits in the original proceedings, or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

If the sentence adjudged by the first court-martial was in accordance with a plea agreement under article 53a and the accused at the rehearing does not comply with the agreement, or if a plea of guilty was entered for an offense at the first court-martial and a plea of not guilty was entered at the rehearing, the sentence as to those charges or specifications may include any punishment not in excess of that which could have been adjudged at the first court-martial, subject to such limitations as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe by regulation.
(c) If, after appeal by the government under article 56(d), the sentence adjudged is set aside and a rehearing on sentence is ordered by the state court, the court-martial may impose any sentence that is in accordance with the order or ruling setting aside the adjudged sentence, subject to such limitations as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe by regulation.

ARTICLE 64. REVIEW BY THE SENIOR FORCE JUDGE ADVOCATE REVIEW OF FINDING OF GUILTY IN SUMMARY COURT-MARTIAL

The senior force judge advocate’s review shall be in writing and shall contain the following:

Conclusions as to whether:

The court had jurisdiction over the accused and the offense;

The charge and specification stated an offense; and

The sentence was within the limits prescribed as a matter of law.

A response to each allegation of error made in writing by the accused.

If the case is sent for action under subsection (b) of this article, a recommendation as to the appropriate action to be taken and an opinion as to whether corrective action is required as a matter of law.

Record. The record of trial and related documents in each case reviewed under subsection (a) of this article shall be sent for action to the adjutant general if:

The judge advocate who reviewed the case recommends corrective action;

The sentence approved under this code extends to dismissal, a bad-conduct or dishonorable discharge, or confinement for more than six (6) months; or

Such action is otherwise required by regulations of the adjutant general.

The adjutant general’s discretion.

The adjutant general may:

Disapprove or approve the findings or sentence, in whole or in part;

Remit, commute, or suspend the sentence in whole or in part;

Except where the evidence was insufficient at the trial to support the findings, order a rehearing on the findings, on the sentence, or on both; or

Dismiss the charges.

If a rehearing is ordered but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, the convening authority shall dismiss the charges.

If the opinion of the senior force judge advocate, or designee, in the senior force judge advocate’s review under subsection (a) of this article is that corrective action is required as a matter of law and if the adjutant general does not take action that is at least as favorable to the accused as that recommended by the judge advocate, the record of trial and action thereon shall be sent to the governor for review and action as deemed appropriate.

The senior force judge advocate, or a designee, may review any case in which there has been a finding of not guilty of all charges and specifications. The senior force judge advocate, or designee, may not review a case under this subsection if that person has acted in the same case as an accuser, investigating officer, member of the court, military judge, or counsel or has otherwise acted on behalf of the prosecution or defense. The senior force judge advocate’s review shall be limited to questions of subject matter jurisdiction.
(e) The record of trial and related documents in each case reviewed under subsection (d) of this article shall be sent for action to the adjutant general.

The adjutant general may:

When subject matter jurisdiction is found to be lacking, void the court-martial ab initio, with or without prejudice to the government, as the adjutant general deems appropriate; or

Return the record of trial and related documents to the senior force judge advocate for appeal by the government as provided by law.

ARTICLE 65. TRANSMITTAL AND REVIEW OF RECORDS

Finding of guilty in general or special court-martial. If the judgment of a general or special court-martial entered under this code includes a finding of guilty, the record shall be transmitted to the state staff judge advocate.

Other cases. In all other cases, records of trial by court-martial and related documents shall be transmitted and disposed of as the adjutant general may prescribe by regulation.

ARTICLE 66. RESERVED

ARTICLE 67. RESERVED

ARTICLE 67A. REVIEW BY STATE APPELLATE AUTHORITY

Decisions of a court-martial are from a court with jurisdiction to issue felony convictions and appeals therefrom will be made to the district court of the judicial district wherein the court-martial was conducted within forty-two (42) days from the entry of judgment. For courts-martial held outside of the state of Idaho, venue for appeal purposes shall be in the district court of the fourth judicial district, Ada county, Idaho. The appellate procedures to be followed shall be those provided by law and rule for the appeal of state criminal cases.

ARTICLE 68. RESERVED

ARTICLE 69. RESERVED

ARTICLE 70. APPELLATE COUNSEL

The senior force judge advocate shall detail a judge advocate as appellate government counsel to represent the state in the review or appeal of cases specified in article 67a of this code and before any federal court when requested to do so by the state attorney general. Appellate government counsel must be a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of the state to which the appeal is taken.

Upon an appeal by the state, an accused has the right to be represented by detailed military counsel before any reviewing authority and before any appellate court.

Upon the appeal by an accused, the accused has the right to be represented by military counsel before any reviewing authority.

Upon the request of an accused entitled to be so represented, the senior force judge advocate shall appoint a judge advocate to represent the accused in the review or appeal of cases specified in subsections (b) and (c) of this article.
(e) An accused may be represented by civilian appellate counsel at no expense to the state.

ARTICLE 71. EXECUTION OF SENTENCE — SUSPENSION OF SENTENCE

If the sentence of the court-martial extends to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge and if the right of the accused to appellate review is not waived, and an appeal is not withdrawn under article 61 of this code, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge may not be executed until there is a final judgment as to the legality of the proceedings. A judgment as to the legality of the proceedings is final in such cases when review is completed by an appellate court prescribed in article 67a of this code and is deemed final by the law of state where the judgment was had.

If the sentence of the court-martial extends to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge and if the right of the accused to appellate review is waived, or an appeal is withdrawn under article 61 of this code, that part of the sentence extending to dismissal or a dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge may not be executed until review of the case by the senior force judge advocate and any action on that review under article 64 of this code is completed. Any other part of a court-martial sentence may be ordered executed by the convening authority or other person acting on the case under article 60 of this code when so approved under that article.

ARTICLE 72. VACATION OF SUSPENSION

Before the vacation of the suspension of a special court-martial sentence, which as approved includes a bad-conduct discharge, or of any general court-martial sentence, the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer shall hold a hearing on an alleged violation of probation. The special court-martial convening authority may detail a judge advocate who is certified under article 27(b) of this code to conduct the hearing. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by military counsel if the probationer so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the officer having special court-martial jurisdiction shall be sent for action to the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the probationer. If the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence, except a dismissal, shall be executed, subject to applicable restrictions under article 57 in this code.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

ARTICLE 73. PETITION FOR A NEW TRIAL

At any time within three (3) years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence, the accused may petition the adjutant general for a new trial on the grounds of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial.

ARTICLE 74. REMISSION AND SUSPENSION

Any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures other than a sentence approved by the governor.
(b) The governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

ARTICLE 75. RESTORATION

Under such regulations as may be prescribed, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon the new trial or rehearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the governor or his designated representative may substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of the accused’s enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the governor or his designated representative may substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue, and the commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the governor alone to such commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the governor that former officer would have attained had he not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer shall be without regard to the existence of a vacancy and shall affect the promotion status of other officers only insofar as the governor may direct. All time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes, including the right to pay and allowances.

The adjutant general may prescribe regulations, with such limitations as the adjutant general considers appropriate, governing eligibility for pay and allowances for the period after the date on which an executed part of a court-martial sentence is set aside.

ARTICLE 76. FINALITY OF PROCEEDINGS, FINDINGS, AND SENTENCES
